Illinois, session 104th, HB2223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2051)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.9(Source: P.A. 79-65.)